lexicon.lexc
+NA+Poss+LocDist+3SgProxPoss:omikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+ObvPl+3PlObvPoss:ominiw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:omiwaa' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:omiwaan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+ObvPl+3SgObvPoss:ominiw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:oma' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:oman EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+ObvSg+3PlObvPoss:ominiw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:omiwaan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+ObvSg+3SgObvPoss:ominiw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:oman EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+Loc+3PlObvPoss:omishining EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+Loc+3PlProxPoss:omishiwaang EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+Loc+3SgObvPoss:omishining EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+Loc+3SgProxPoss:omishing EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+LocDist+3PlObvPoss:omishinikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+LocDist+3PlProxPoss:omishiwaakaang EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+LocDist+3SgObvPoss:omishinikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+LocDist+3SgProxPoss:omishikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3PlObvPoss:omishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:omishiwaa' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:omishiwaan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3SgObvPoss:omishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:omisha' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:omishan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+ObvSg+3PlObvPoss:omishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:omishiwaan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+ObvSg+3SgObvPoss:omishiniw1 EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pej+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:omishan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3PlObvPoss:ominiban EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:omiwaabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:omiwaabanii' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:omiwaabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3SgObvPoss:ominiban EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:omibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:omibanii' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:omibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3PlObvPoss:ominiban EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:omiwaabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:omiwaabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3SgObvPoss:ominiban EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:omibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Poss+Pret+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:omibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvPl+3PlObvPoss:oniban EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:owaabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:owaabanii' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvPl+3PlProxPoss:owaabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvPl+3SgObvPoss:oniban EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:obanen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:obanii' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvPl+3SgProxPoss:obaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvSg+3PlObvPoss:oniban EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:owaabanen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvSg+3PlProxPoss:owaabaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvSg+3SgObvPoss:oniban EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:obanen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvSg+3SgProxPoss:obaniin EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NA, Class: NA_ShortCw                                      !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending_Prefix=NONE                                        !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NA_Class=NA_ShortCw_Flags_Prefix=NONE
@U.Order.Other@ NA_Class=NA_ShortCw_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NA, Class: NA_ShortCw, Prefix: NONE, Order: Other          !
!         Endings                                                              !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NA_Class=NA_ShortCw_Prefix=NONE_Order=Other_Endings
+NA+Dim+Loc:oonsing EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+LocDist:oonsikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+ObvPl:oonsa' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+ObvPl:oonsan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+ObvSg:oonsan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pej+Loc:oonzhishing EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pej+LocDist:oonzhishikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pej+ObvPl:oonzhisha' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pej+ObvPl:oonzhishan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pej+ObvSg:oonzhishan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pej+ProxPl:oonzhishag EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pej+ProxSg:oonzhish EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pej+Voc:oonzhishidog EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pret+ObvPl:oonsibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pret+ObvPl:oonsibanii' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pret+ObvPl:oonsibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pret+ObvSg:oonsibanen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pret+ObvSg:oonsibaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pret+ProxPl:oonsibaneg EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pret+ProxPl:oonsibaniig EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Pret+ProxSg:oonsiban EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+ProxPl:oonsag EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+ProxSg:oons EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Dim+Voc:oonsidog EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Loc:ong EncliticRoot ;
+NA+LocDist:okaang EncliticRoot ;
+NA+ObvPl:a' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+ObvPl:an EncliticRoot ;
+NA+ObvSg:an EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pej+Loc:oshing EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pej+LocDist:oshikaang EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pej+ObvPl:osha' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pej+ObvPl:oshan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pej+ObvSg:oshan EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pej+ProxPl:oshag EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pej+ProxSg:osh EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pej+Voc:oshidog EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvPl:obanen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvPl:obanii' EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvPl:obaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvSg:obanen EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ObvSg:obaniin EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ProxPl:obaneg EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ProxPl:obaniig EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Pret+ProxSg:oban EncliticRoot ;
+NA+ProxPl:ag EncliticRoot ;
+NA+ProxSg:a1 EncliticRoot ;
+NA+Voc:odog EncliticRoot ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NA, Class: NA_VV                                           !
!         Morpheme boundary between stem and suffix                            !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary
0:%>%> NA_Class=NA_VV_Flags ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!                                                                              !
!         Paradigm: NA, Class: NA_VV                                           !
!         Flag diacritic governing combinations between                        !
!         prefix and ending                                                    !
!                                                                              !
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON NA_Stems
aamoo:aamoow2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
aanikanootaagewikwe:aanikanootaagewikwew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
aanike-ogimaa:aanike-ogimaaw2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
adaawewininiikwe:adaawewininiikwew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
ajidamoo:ajidamoow2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
amiko-wiinzhinaa:amiko-wiinzhinaaw2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
anama'ewikwe:anama'ewikwew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
animikii:animikiiw2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
anishinaabe-ogimaa:anishinaabe-ogimaaw2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
anokiiwikwe:anokiiwikwew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
apishi-ogimaa NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
asemaa:asemaaw2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
ashkibwaa:ashkibwaaw2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
awaazisii:awaazisiiw2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
aya'aa NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
azhede:azhedew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
baapaagokozhiwewikwe:baapaagokozhiwewikwew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
babiizigaakizigewikwe:babiizigaakizigewikwew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
bakwezhiganikewikwe:bakwezhiganikewikwew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
bebezhigooganzhii:bebezhigooganzhiiw2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
biijigigwane:biijigigwanew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
biinichigewikwe:biinichigewikwew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
biiwide:biiwidew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
bine:binew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
boodawaadamii:boodawaadamiiw2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
bwaanikwe:bwaanikwew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
dakoniwewikwe:dakoniwewikwew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
dibaakonigewikwe:dibaakonigewikwew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
enigoo:enigoow2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
ezigaa:ezigaaw2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
gagiikwewikwe:gagiikwewikwew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
gete-aya'aa:gete-aya'aaw2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
gichi-aya'aa:gichi-aya'aaw2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
gichi-manidoo:gichi-manidoow2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
gichi-mookomaanikwe:gichi-mookomaanikwew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
gichi-ogimaakwe:gichi-ogimaakwew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
giidakiwenzii:giidakiwenziiw2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
giimoodishkiiwikwe:giimoodishkiiwikwew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
gikinoo'amaagewikwe:gikinoo'amaagewikwew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
ginoozhe:ginoozhew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
gizhe-manidoo:gizhe-manidoow2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
gookooko'oo:gookooko'oow2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
gwiingwa'aage:gwiingwa'aagew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
ininiwaya'aa:ininiwaya'aaw2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
jiibaakwewikwe:jiibaakwewikwew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
maji-manidoo:maji-manidoow2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
makadewikonaye:makadewikonayew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
manidoo:manidoow2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
mashkikiiwikwe:mashkikiiwikwew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
mashwe:mashwew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
mayagi-anishinaabe:mayagi-anishinaabew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
mazina'igani-zhooniyaa:mazina'igani-zhooniyaaw2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
mazinibii'igewikwe:mazinibii'igewikwew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
mekadewikonayewikwe:mekadewikonayewikwew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
memengwaa:memengwaaw2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
misaabe:misaabew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
misajidamoo:misajidamoow2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
mishiibizhii:mishiibizhiiw2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
mooningwane:mooningwanew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
moozhaabe:moozhaabew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
na'aanganikwe:na'aanganikwew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
newe:newew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
obiigomakakii:obiigomakakiiw2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
obwayawe:obwayawew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
odaakewigimaa:odaakewigimaaw2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
ogashkimanisii:ogashkimanisiiw2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
ogichidaakwe:ogichidaakwew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
ogiishkimanisii:ogiishkimanisiiw2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
ogimaa-mishiibizhii:ogimaa-mishiibizhiiw2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
ojibwe:ojibwew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
ojibwekwe:ojibwekwew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
omagakii:omagakiiw2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
omanoominii:omanoominiiw2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
omiimii:omiimiiw2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
ookwe:ookwew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
oshkaya'ii:oshkaya'iiw2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
oshki-ikwe:oshki-ikwew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
oshkiniigikwe:oshkiniigikwew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
ozhaawashko-ginoozhe:ozhaawashko-ginoozhew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
waabizii:waabiziiw2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
wanii'igewikwe:wanii'igewikwew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
wewiibingwaange:wewiibingwaangew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
wiinaange:wiinaangew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
wiinibiigoo:wiinibiigoow2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
zagime:zagimew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
zhagashkaandawe:zhagashkaandawew2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
zhimaaganishii-ogimaa:zhimaaganishii-ogimaaw2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
ziikaa:ziikaaw2 NA_Class=NA_VV_Boundary ;
